Massachusetts, session 194th, S1759.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 22C of the General Laws is hereby amending by adding the following new
section:
Section XX. There is hereby established a career incentive pay program offering base
salary increases to regular full-time members of the state police department as an incentive for
furthering the education of current officers and recruiting diverse candidates to the state police
through future recruitment and the cadet program. This section shall not apply to officers
currently receiving career incentive pay for educational degrees under any other program or law.
Police career incentive base salary increases shall be predicated on the accumulation of
points earned in the following manner: one point for each semester hour credit earned toward a
of 2

baccalaureate or an associate degree; sixty points for an associate degree; one hundred and
twenty points for a baccalaureate degree; and one hundred and fifty points for a degree of master
or for a degree in law. All semester credits and degrees shall be earned in an accredited
educational institution and shall be credited for the purpose of determining points under this
section, notwithstanding the date of appointment of an individual to a position described in the
first paragraph of this section. Only graduates of: (1) an accredited degree program offered by
an institution of higher learning in order to ensure diverse educational backgrounds of current
and future officers, or (2) accredited law schools and who have passed the Massachusetts bar
examination shall be eligible for the police career incentive pay program.
Base salary increases authorized by this section shall be granted in the following manner:
a ten per cent increase for sixty points, a twenty per cent increase for one hundred and twenty
points, and a twenty-five per cent increase for one hundred and fifty points so accumulated.
of 2